New Jersey, session 222, A1595.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due for the taxable year under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 30 percent of the qualified electric bicycle purchase expenses incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, except that the credit shall not exceed $1,500. b.    The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section, and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., shall be as prescribed by the director.  The amount of the credit, together with any other credits allowed by law, shall not reduce the taxpayers liability otherwise due for the taxable year under N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. to an amount less than zero. c.     Notwithstanding any provision of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the director may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law and no later than the 90th day after the effective date of this act, such rules and regulations as the director deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section, which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 18 months.  The regulations shall thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the director in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). d.    As used in this section: Low-speed electric bicycle means the same as that term is defined in R.S.39:1-1. Qualified electric bicycle purchase expense means an amount incurred for the purchase of a low-speed electric bicycle, provided that the low-speed electric bicycle shall not be used in the conduct of business, and the receipt from the purchase of the low-speed electric bicycle shall not exceed $8,000. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the date of enactment.